District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.72b

Merger or consolidation — Domestic corporation and limited liability company.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 179, ch. 269, § 72b
as added July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 77, 41 DCR 3010
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.72b.
1981 Ed., § 29-372.2.